Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1988.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1 of the act of May 1, 1913 (P.L.155, No.104), referred to as the Separations Act, is amended to read:Section 1. Be it enacted, &c., That hereafter in the preparation of specifications for the erection, construction, and alteration of any public building, when the entire cost of such work shall exceed four thousand dollars, it shall be the duty of the architect, engineer, or other person preparing such specifications, to prepare separate specifications for the plumbing, heating, ventilating, fire sprinkler and suppression services and electrical work; and it shall be the duty of the person or persons authorized to enter into contracts for the erection, construction, or alteration of such public buildings 1234567891011121314151617181920 to receive separate bids upon each of the said branches of work, and to award the contract for the same to the lowest responsible bidder for each of said branches.Every contract for the construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, improvement or maintenance of public works shall comply with the provisions of the act of March 3, 1978 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the "Steel Products Procurement Act."Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1.1. The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Fire sprinkler and suppression services." A system individually designed to protect the interior or exterior of a specific building or buildings, structure or other special hazard from fire. The term includes, but is not limited to, the following:(1) Water sprinkler systems.(2) Water misting systems.(3) Foam-water sprinkler systems.(4) Foam-water spray systems.(5) Carbon dioxide fire protection systems.(6) Foam extinguishing systems.(7) Dry chemical systems.(8) Halon and other chemical systems used for fire protection use.(9) Overhead and underground fire mains.(10) Fire hydrants and hydrant mains.(11) Standpipe systems and hoses connected to sprinkler systems.(12) Sprinkler tank heaters.20250HB1988PN2507 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (13) Air lines.(14) Thermal systems used regarding fire sprinkler systems.(15) Tanks and pumps connected to fire sprinkler systems.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1988PN2507 - 3 - 1234